District of Columbia statutes.
4-754.54

Shelter monitoring staff.

(a)

Employees of the Office shall agree in writing to comply with all applicable confidentiality requirements in accordance with their official duties.

(b)

The Office shall train its employees, as appropriate, in compliance with applicable confidentiality restrictions, in homeless shelter program evaluation, and in sensitivity to the diversity of persons who are homeless in the District.

(c)

The Office shall endeavor to hire staff who reflect the diversity of people accessing shelter in the District, including with respect to disability status, language, and experience being homeless.

Oct. 22, 2005, D.C. Law 16-35, § 27d
as added Mar. 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-296, § 2(i), 54 DCR 1097

History